District of Columbia statutes.
40-307.03

Enforcement by bill in equity.

If the value of the property so subject to lien shall exceed the sum of $50, the proceeding to enforce such lien shall be by bill or petition in equity, and the decree, which shall be rendered according to the due course of proceedings in equity, besides subjecting the thing upon which the lien was attached to sale for the satisfaction of the plaintiff’s demand, shall adjudge that the plaintiff recover his demand against the defendant from whom such claim is due, and may have execution therefor as at law.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1388, ch. 854, § 1264
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1397, Pub. L. 91-537, § 4(a)(1)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 38-126.
1973 Ed., § 38-126.